Utah statutes.
53A-1-612.   Basic Skills Education Stipend Program.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Basic skills education" means individual or group instruction, including
assessments, designed to develop the skills and knowledge necessary to pass
the Utah Basic Skills Competency Test.
(b)  "Basic skills provider" means:
(i)  a school district;
(ii)  a charter school;
(iii)  an accredited public or private educational institution; or
(iv)  other entity that meets board requirements pursuant to Subsection (12).
(c)  "Program" means the Basic Skills Education Stipend Program.
(d)  "Stipend recipient" means a student who receives a stipend under this
section.
(e)  "Utah Basic Skills Competency Test" or "UBSCT" means the basic skills
competency test administered to students pursuant to Section 53A-1-611.
(2)  The Basic Skills Education Stipend Program is created to provide students
who have not passed the UBSCT supplemental instruction in the skills and
knowledge necessary to pass the test.
(3)  The State Board of Education shall administer the Basic Skills Education
Stipend Program.
(4) (a)  A student may receive a stipend for basic skills education if:
(i)  the student's score on one more subtests is below the midpoint of the
partial mastery range;
(ii)  the student's parent or guardian is a Utah resident;
(iii)  the student is enrolled full-time in a public school in the state; and
(iv)  the student does not qualify for the Utah Alternative Assessment.
(b)  A student who meets the criteria of Subsection (4)(a) may receive a
stipend for basic skills education in the subject of each subtest failed.
Depending upon the number of subtests failed, a student may receive one, two,
or three stipends.  A student may receive a stipend only once for each subtest
failed.
(5)  Stipend amounts shall be based on a student's subtest score as follows:
(a)  $500, if the student's subtest score was below the midpoint of the
partial mastery range but above the minimal mastery range;
(b)  $1,000, if the student's subtest score was below the partial mastery
range, but above or at the midpoint of the minimal mastery range; or
(c)  $1,500, if the student's subtest score was below the midpoint of the
minimal mastery range.
(6)  A stipend recipient may apply for basic skills education from any basic
skills provider.
(7)  Each basic skill provider shall accept stipend recipients on a first
come/first served basis.
(8)  A stipend recipient shall give the following to the basic skills provider
selected to provide basic skills education:
(a)  a voucher in the amount of the stipend which the basic skills educator
may present for payment by the board if the stipend recipient passes the
subtest corresponding to the basic skills education provided by the basic
skills provider; and
(b)  an authorization signed by the stipend recipient's parent or guardian for
the stipend recipient's school to release records of the stipend recipient to
the basic skills provider, if the basic skills provider is not the school
district or charter school in which the stipend recipient is enrolled.
(9)  A basic skills provider who possesses a voucher shall receive payment
from the board in the amount of the stipend, if, on a subsequent
administration of the UBSCT, the stipend recipient passes the subtest
corresponding to the basic skills education provided by the basic skills
provider.
(10) (a)  A basic skills provider may charge a stipend recipient an amount in
addition to that paid by the board.
(b)  The additional amount charged by a basic skills provider shall be:
(i)  consistent with the restriction in Utah Constitution Article X, Section
2;
(ii)  disclosed to the stipend recipient's parent or guardian when the stipend
recipient applies for basic skills education; and
(iii)  reported to the board before receiving payment from the board.
(c)  A basic skills provider may not make any additional charge or refund of a
charge contingent upon a stipend recipient's passing or failing a UBSCT
subtest.
(11) (a)  Stipends shall be awarded by the board subject to the availability
of money appropriated by the Legislature for that purpose.
(b)  The Legislature shall annually appropriate money to the board from the
General Fund to make stipend payments.
(c)  If monies are not available to pay for all stipends requested, the
stipends shall be allocated according to rules adopted by the State Board of
Education.
(12)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the State Board of Education shall make rules:
(a)  establishing qualifications for basic skills providers who are not school
districts, high schools, or accredited public or private educational
institutions;
(b)  establishing procedures for the administration of the Basic Skills
Education Stipend Program; and
(c)  requiring the parent or guardian of a stipend recipient who selects a
basic skills provider other than the school district or charter school in
which the stipend recipient is enrolled to sign:
(i)  an acknowledgment that the school district or charter school is released
from further remediation responsibility for the stipend recipient; and
(ii)  if the student has an IEP, an acknowledgment that offering a voucher to
the basic skill provider has the same effect as a parental refusal to consent
to services pursuant to Section 614(a)(1) of the Individuals with Disabilities
Education Act, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.
(13)  School districts and charter schools shall provide each student who
qualifies for a basic skills education stipend information about the Basic
Skills Education Stipend Program, including:
(a)  voucher applications; and
(b)  how to access a list of approved public and private providers.
